District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-513

Cure by lessor of improper tender or delivery; replacement.

(a)

If any tender or delivery by the lessor or the supplier is rejected because nonconforming and the time for performance has not yet expired, the lessor or the supplier may seasonably notify the lessee of the lessor’s or the supplier’s intention to cure and may then make a conforming delivery within the time provided in the lease contract.

(b)

If the lessee rejects a nonconforming tender that the lessor or the supplier had reasonable grounds to believe would be acceptable with or without money allowance, the lessor or the supplier may have a further reasonable time to substitute a conforming tender if he or she seasonably notifies the lessee.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28:2A-514.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-513.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-508.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Conforming”. Section 2A-103(1)(d).

“Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).

“Money”. Section 1-201(24).

“Notifies”. Section 1-201(26).

“Reasonable time”. Section 1-204(1) and (2).

“Seasonably”. Section 1-204(3).

“Supplier”. Section 2A-103(1)(x).